Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 3. Resignation; Termination

§ 6.30.
Resignation.

A member may resign at any time.

The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the corporation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.31.
Termination; expulsion and suspension.

No member of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships may be terminated or suspended except pursuant to a procedure which is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

A procedure is fair and reasonable when either:

the articles or bylaws set forth a procedure that provides:

not less than 15 days prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension or termination and the reasons therefor; and

an opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination by a person or persons authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination, or suspension not take place; or

it is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances.

Any written notice given by mail must be given by first class or certified mail sent to the last address of the member shown on the corporation’s records.

Any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, must be commenced within one year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination.

A member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to expulsion or suspension.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.32.
Purchase of memberships.

A public benefit corporation may not purchase any of its memberships or any right arising therefrom.

A mutual benefit corporation may purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions set forth in or authorized by its articles or bylaws. No payment shall be made in violation of chapter 13 of this title.

A corporation may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members, directors, or officers for services rendered, may confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes, and upon dissolution or final liquidation may make distributions to its members as permitted by this chapter, and no such payment, benefit, or distribution shall be deemed to be a dividend or distribution of income or profit.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.